Utah statutes.
57-25-107.   Notice.

(1)  A copy of an environmental covenant shall be provided by the persons and in the manner required by the agency to:

(a)  each person that signed the covenant;

(b)  each person holding a recorded interest in the real property subject to the covenant;

(c)  each person in possession of the real property subject to the covenant;

(d)  each municipality or other unit of local government in which real property subject to the covenant is located; and

(e)  any other person that the agency requires.

(2)  The validity of a covenant is not affected by failure to provide a copy of the covenant as required under this section.

